Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 49 Ignition Interlock Systems

31-49-1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, “ignition interlock system” means a device that:

Connects a motor vehicle ignition system to a breath analyzer that measures a driver’s blood alcohol level; and

Prevents a motor vehicle ignition from starting if a driver’s blood alcohol level exceeds the calibrated setting on the device.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 405, § 3.

31-49-2.
Certification of ignition interlock systems.

The division of motor vehicles shall certify, or cause to be certified, ignition interlock systems for use in the state, and adopt rules and regulations for the certification and requirements for participation of the ignition interlock systems. All costs associated with the installation of the ignition interlock system shall be borne by the person required to install said system and the division shall charge an administrative fee of one hundred dollars ($100) to the person ordered to install said system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 405, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 230, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 326, § 3.

31-49-3.
Rules and regulations.

The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to §

31-49-2

shall include requirements that ignition interlock systems:

Do not impede the safe operation of the vehicle;

Minimize opportunities to be bypassed;

Correlate accurately with established measures of blood alcohol levels;

Work accurately and reliably in an unsupervised environment;

Require a proper and accurate measure of blood alcohol levels;

Resist tampering and provide evidence of attempted tampering;

Are difficult to circumvent, and require premeditation to circumvent;

Minimize inconvenience to a sober user;

Are manufactured by a party responsible for installation, user training, service, and maintenance;

Operate reliably over the range of motor vehicle environments or motor vehicle manufacturing standards;

Are manufactured by a person who is adequately insured for products liability; and

Provide the option for an electronic log of the driver’s experience with the system.

Upon the expiration of the interlock order by the court, the division of motor vehicles shall review the person’s compliance with the ignition interlock order to ensure that the person has fulfilled the specific requirements as set forth by the sentencing judge or magistrate. Upon verification that said conditions have been satisfied, a motorist’s license shall be reinstated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 405, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 230, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 326, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 141, § 2.

31-49-4.
Warning label.

The division of motor vehicles shall design and adopt a warning label to be affixed to an ignition interlock system on installation. The warning label shall state that a person tampering with, circumventing, or otherwise misusing the ignition interlock system is guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction, is subject to a fine up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or one year imprisonment, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 405, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 32; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 32; P.L. 2014, ch. 230, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 326, § 3.

31-49-5.
List of certified ignition interlock systems.

The division of motor vehicles shall publish a list of certified ignition interlock systems that shall be included on the division of motor vehicles’ website.

A manufacturer of an ignition interlock system that seeks to sell or lease the ignition interlock system to persons subject to the provisions of §

31-27-2.8

shall pay the costs of obtaining the required certification.

Said manufacturer who shall install and monitor said systems shall be approved by the division of motor vehicles every year. Said manufacturer shall also submit quarterly reports concerning proof of installation and proper use of said ignition interlock systems to the division of motor vehicles, which will be aggregated by the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 405, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 230, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 326, § 3.

31-49-6.
Selling or leasing ignition interlock systems.

A person may not sell or lease, or offer to sell or lease, an ignition interlock system to a person subject to the provisions of §

31-27-2.8

unless:

The system has been certified by the division of motor vehicles; and

A warning label approved by the division of motor vehicles is affixed to the system stating that a person who tampers, circumvents, or otherwise misuses the system is guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction is subject to a fine up to one thousand dollars ($1,000), or one year imprisonment, or both.

A person who sells or leases ignition interlock systems in the state shall:

Monitor the use of the system as required by the division of motor vehicles; and

Issue a report of the results of the monitoring to the appropriate office of the division of motor vehicles and the division of parole and probation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 405, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 230, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 326, § 3.